Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Chapter 03. Division of Recruitment and Retention.

Sec. 26.03.010.
Recruitment and retention division.

There is created within the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs a division of recruitment and retention.

History.

(§ 1 ch 187 SLA 1970; am E.O. No. 58, § 3 (1984))

Sec. 26.03.020.
Appointment of director.

The adjutant general shall appoint a director who is at least an administrative officer three.

History.

(§ 1 ch 187 SLA 1970)

Sec. 26.03.030.
Authority and duties of the director.

The director shall

take the necessary steps to assure that unemployed guardsmen have the opportunity to acquire employment through the state and federal governments;

keep guardsmen advised of all privileges and benefits available to them from the state and federal governments;

act as a coordinator with the state and federal governments in an effort to increase the availability of education and training programs for guardsmen;

compile a list of guardsmen and their educational and training qualifications and submit it to the federal and state agencies for possible job placement;

prepare a program whereby guardsmen are trained in firefighting and related skills and coordinate this effort with state and federal programs; and

provide counseling service for guardsmen in order to find educational, training, and employment opportunities for them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 187 SLA 1970)